Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 7
PARTNER'S DISSOCIATION WHEN
BUSINESS NOT WOUND UP

7-64-701. Purchase of dissociated partner's interest.

If a partner is dissociated from a partnership without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under section 7-64-801, the partnership shall cause the dissociated partner's interest in the partnership to be purchased for a buyout price determined pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

The buyout price of a dissociated partner's interest is an amount equal to the value of the partner's interest in the partnership. Interest shall be paid from the date of dissociation to the date of payment.

Damages for wrongful dissociation under section 7-64-602 (2), and all other amounts owing, whether or not presently due, from the dissociated partner to the partnership, shall be offset against the buyout price. Interest shall be paid from the date the amount owed becomes due to the date of payment.

A partnership shall indemnify a dissociated partner whose interest is being purchased against all partnership obligations, whether incurred before or after the dissociation, except partnership obligations incurred by an act of the dissociated partner under section 7-64-702.

If no agreement for the purchase of a dissociated partner's interest is reached within one hundred twenty days after a written demand for payment, the partnership shall pay, or cause to be paid, in cash to the dissociated partner the amount the partnership estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets and accrued interest under subsection (3) of this section.

If a deferred payment is authorized under subsection (8) of this section, the partnership may tender a written offer to pay the amount it estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets under subsection (3) of this section, stating the time of payment, the amount and type of security for payment, and the other terms and conditions of the obligation.

The payment or tender required by subsection (5) or (6) of this section shall be accompanied by the following:

A written statement of partnership assets and liabilities as of the date of dissociation;

The latest available partnership balance sheet and income statement, if any;

A written explanation of how the estimated amount of the payment was calculated; and

A written statement that the payment is in full satisfaction of the obligation to purchase unless, within one hundred twenty days after receipt of the written statement, the dissociated partner commences an action to determine the buyout price, any offsets under subsection (3) of this section, or other terms of the obligation to purchase.

Payment of any portion of the buyout price to a partner who wrongfully dissociates before the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking may be deferred until the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, unless the partner establishes to the satisfaction of the court that earlier payment will not cause undue hardship to the business of the partnership. A deferred payment shall be adequately secured and bear interest.

A dissociated partner may maintain an action against the partnership, pursuant to section 7-64-405 (2)(b)(II), to determine the buyout price of that partner's interest, any offsets under subsection (3) of this section, or other terms of the obligation to purchase. The action shall be commenced within one hundred twenty days after the partnership has tendered payment or an offer to pay or within one year after written demand for payment if no payment or offer to pay is tendered. The court shall determine the buyout price of the dissociated partner's interest, any offset due under subsection (3) of this section, and accrued interest and enter judgment for any additional payment or refund. If deferred payment is authorized under subsection (8) of this section, the court shall also determine the security for payment and other terms of the obligation to purchase. The court may assess reasonable attorneys' fees and the fees and expenses of appraisers or other experts for a party to the action, in amounts the court finds equitable, against a party that the court finds acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith. The finding may be based on the partnership's failure to tender payment or an offer to pay or to comply with subsection (7) of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 888, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-702. Dissociated partner's power to bind and liability to partnership.

For two years after a partner dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, the partnership, including a surviving partnership under part 2 of article 90 of this title, is bound by an act of the dissociated partner that would have bound the partnership under section 7-64-301 before dissociation only if at the time of entering into the transaction the other party:

Reasonably believed that the dissociated partner was then a partner; and

Did not have notice of the partner's dissociation.

A dissociated partner is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from an obligation incurred by the dissociated partner after dissociation for which the partnership is liable under subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 889, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended, p. 2253, § 157, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-703. Dissociated partner's liability to other persons.

A partner's dissociation does not of itself discharge the partner's liability for a partnership obligation incurred before dissociation. A dissociated partner is not liable for a partnership obligation incurred after dissociation, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section.

A partner who dissociates without resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business is liable as a partner to the other party in a transaction entered into by the partnership, or a surviving partnership under part 2 of article 90 of this title, within two years after the partner's dissociation, only if the partnership obligation arising from such transaction is one for which the partner would have been liable under section 7-64-306 had such partner not dissociated and, at the time of entering into the transaction, the other party:

Substantially relied on a reasonable belief that the dissociated partner was then a partner; and

Did not have notice of the partner's dissociation.

By agreement with the partnership creditor and the partners continuing the business, a dissociated partner may be released from liability for a partnership obligation.

A dissociated partner is released from liability for a partnership obligation if a partnership creditor, with notice of the partner's dissociation but without the partner's consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of a partnership obligation.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 890, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(2) amended, p. 2253, § 158, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-704. Statement of dissociation.

A dissociated partner or the partnership may deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of dissociation stating the true name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership.

A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a dissociated partner for purposes of section 7-64-303 (3) and (4).

For purposes of sections 7-64-702 (1)(b) and 7-64-703 (2)(b), a person other than the partnership or one of its partners has notice of the dissociation ninety days after the statement of dissociation is filed in the records of the secretary of state.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 890, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 955, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1826, § 56, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1691, § 54, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 2254, § 159, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1451, § 160, effective July 1.

7-64-705. Continued use of partnership name.

Continued use of a partnership name, or a dissociated partner's name as part thereof, by partners continuing the business does not of itself make the dissociated partner liable for an obligation of the partners or the partnership continuing the business.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 890, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.